Illinois, session 104th, HB2681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Park District Code is amended by changing 5Section 8-3 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1205/8-3)  (from Ch. 105, par. 8-3)7    Sec. 8-3. All park districts shall retain and be vested 8with all power and authority contained in the Park District 9and Municipal Aquarium and Museum Act an act entitled "An Act 10concerning Aquariums and Museums in Public Parks", approved 11June 17, 1898, as amended.12(Source: Laws 1951, p. 113.) 13    Section 10. The Park District Aquarium and Museum Act is 14amended by changing Sections 0.01, 1 and 2 as follows: 15    (70 ILCS 1290/0.01)  (from Ch. 105, par. 325h)16    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Park 17District and Municipal Aquarium and Museum Act.18(Source: P.A. 86-1324.) 19    (70 ILCS 1290/1)  (from Ch. 105, par. 326)20    Sec. 1. Erect, operate, and maintain aquariums and   HB2681- 2 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1museums. The corporate authorities of municipalities cities 2and park districts having control or supervision over any 3public park or parks, including parks located on formerly 4submerged land, are hereby authorized to purchase, erect, and 5maintain within any such public park or parks edifices to be 6used as aquariums or as museums of art, industry, science, or 7natural or other history, including presidential libraries, 8centers, and museums, such aquariums and museums consisting of 9all facilities for their collections, exhibitions, 10programming, and associated initiatives, or to permit the 11directors or trustees of any corporation or society organized 12for the construction or maintenance and operation of an 13aquarium or museum as hereinabove described to erect, enlarge, 14ornament, build, rebuild, rehabilitate, improve, maintain, and 15operate its aquarium or museum within any public park now or 16hereafter under the control or supervision of any municipality 17city or park district, and to contract with any such directors 18or trustees of any such aquarium or museum relative to the 19erection, enlargement, ornamentation, building, rebuilding, 20rehabilitation, improvement, maintenance, ownership, and 21operation of such aquarium or museum. Notwithstanding the 22previous sentence, a municipality city or park district may 23enter into a lease for an initial term not to exceed 99 years, 24subject to renewal, allowing a corporation or society as 25hereinabove described to erect, enlarge, ornament, build, 26rebuild, rehabilitate, improve, maintain, and operate its   HB2681- 3 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1aquarium or museum, together with grounds immediately adjacent 2to such aquarium or museum, and to use, possess, and occupy 3grounds surrounding such aquarium or museum as hereinabove 4described for the purpose of beautifying and maintaining such 5grounds in a manner consistent with the aquarium or museum's 6purpose, and on the conditions that (1) the public is allowed 7access to such grounds in a manner consistent with its access 8to other public parks, and (2) the municipality city or park 9district retains a reversionary interest in any improvements 10made by the corporation or society on the grounds, including 11the aquarium or museum itself, that matures upon the 12expiration or lawful termination of the lease. It is hereby 13reaffirmed and found that the aquariums and museums as 14described in this Section, and their collections, exhibitions, 15programming, and associated initiatives, serve valuable public 16purposes, including, but not limited to, furthering human 17knowledge and understanding, educating and inspiring the 18public, and expanding recreational and cultural resources and 19opportunities. Any municipality city or park district may 20charge, or permit such an aquarium or museum to charge, an 21admission fee. Any such aquarium or museum, however, shall be 22open without charge, when accompanied by a teacher, to the 23children in actual attendance upon grades kindergarten through 2412 twelve in any of the schools in this State at all times. In 25addition, except as otherwise provided in this Section, any 26such aquarium or museum must be open to persons who reside in   HB2681- 4 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1this State without charge for a period equivalent to 52 days, 2at least 6 of which must be during the period from June through 3August, each year. Beginning on the effective date of this 4amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly through June 30, 52022, any such aquarium or museum must be open to persons who 6reside in this State without charge for a period equivalent to 752 days, at least 6 of which must be during the period from 8June through August, 2021. Any such museum shall be open 9without charge throughout the year to an Illinois resident who 10shows a driver's license or Illinois Identification Card 11containing a designation that the resident is a Gold Star 12Family member. Notwithstanding said provisions, charges may be 13made at any time for special services and for admission to 14special facilities within any aquarium or museum for the 15education, entertainment, or convenience of visitors. The 16proceeds of such admission fees and charges for special 17services and special facilities shall be devoted exclusively 18to the purposes for which the tax authorized by Section 2 19hereof may be used. If any owner or owners of any lands or lots 20abutting or fronting on any such public park, or adjacent 21thereto, have any private right, easement, interest or 22property in such public park appurtenant to their lands or 23lots or otherwise, which would be interfered with by the 24erection and maintenance of any aquarium or museum as 25hereinbefore provided, or any right to have such public park 26remain open or vacant and free from buildings, the corporate   HB2681- 5 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1authorities of the municipality city or park district having 2control of such park, may condemn the same in the manner 3prescribed for the exercise of the right of eminent domain 4under the Eminent Domain Act. The changes made to this Section 5by this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly are 6declaratory of existing law and shall not be construed as a new 7enactment. 8(Source: P.A. 103-933, eff. 1-1-25.) 9    (70 ILCS 1290/2)  (from Ch. 105, par. 327)10    Sec. 2. Maintenance tax; limitations; levy and collection -11 Limitations - Levy and collection. The corporate authorities 12of a municipality or a Each board of park commissioners, 13having control of a public park or parks within which there 14shall be maintained any aquarium or any museum or museums of 15art, industry, science or natural or other history under the 16provisions of this Act may , is hereby authorized, subject to 17the provisions of Section 4 of this Act, to levy annually a tax 18on not to exceed .03 per cent in park districts of less than 19500,000 population and in districts of over 500,000 population 20not to exceed .15 percent of the full, fair cash value, as 21equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue, of taxable 22property embraced in the said district or municipality, 23according to the valuation of the same as made for the purpose 24of State and county taxation by the general assessment last 25preceding the time when the such tax hereby authorized under   HB2681- 6 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1this Section shall be levied. The : Such tax levied under this 2Section shall to be for the purpose of establishing, 3acquiring, completing, erecting, enlarging, ornamenting, 4building, rebuilding, rehabilitating, improving, operating, 5maintaining, and caring for such aquarium and museum or 6museums and the buildings and grounds thereof, ; and the 7proceeds of such additional tax shall be kept as a separate 8fund. The Said tax shall be in addition to all other taxes 9which the such board of park commissioners or the corporate 10authorities of the municipality are is now or hereafter may be 11authorized to levy on the aggregate valuation of all taxable 12property within the park district or municipality, and the 13annual levy under this Section shall not exceed either (i) 140.03% of the full, fair cash value of taxable property 15embraced in the district or municipality for municipalities 16with a population of less than 500,000 and park districts with 17a population of less than 500,000 or (ii) 0.15% of the full, 18fair cash value of taxable property embraced in the district 19or municipality for municipalities with a population greater 20than or equal to 500,000 and park districts with a population 21greater than or equal to 500,000. The Said tax shall be levied 22and collected in like manner as the general taxes for such 23parks and shall not be included within any limitation of rate 24for general park or municipal purposes as now or hereafter 25provided by law but shall be excluded therefrom and be in 26addition thereto and in excess thereof, except . Provided,   HB2681- 7 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1further, that the foregoing limitations upon tax rates, 2insofar as they are applicable to municipalities of less than 3500,000 population or park districts of less than 500,000 4population, may be further increased or decreased according to 5the referendum provisions of the General Revenue Law of 6Illinois.7    Whenever the corporate authorities of a municipality with 8a population of less than 500,000 or the board of park 9commissioners of a park district with a population of less 10than 500,000 population adopts a resolution that it shall levy 11and collect a tax for the purposes specified in this Section in 12excess of .03% percent but not to exceed .07% percent of the 13value of taxable property in the district or municipality, the 14corporate authorities or board shall cause the resolution to 15be published at least once in a newspaper of general 16circulation within the district or municipality. If there is 17no such newspaper, the resolution shall be posted in at least 3 18public places within the district or municipality. The 19publication or posting of the resolution shall include a 20notice of (1) the specific number of electors required to sign 21a petition requesting that the question of the adoption of the 22resolution be submitted to the electors of the district or 23municipality; (2) the time within which the petition must be 24filed; and (3) the date of the prospective referendum.25    The secretary of the park district or the clerk of the 26municipality shall provide a petition form to any individual   HB2681- 8 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1requesting one.2    Any taxpayer in such district or municipality may, within 330 days after the first publication or posting of the 4resolution, file with the secretary of the park district or 5municipality a petition signed by not less than 10% percent or 61,500, whichever is lesser, of the electors of the district or 7municipality requesting that the following question be 8submitted to the electors of the district or municipality:9    "Shall the (insert name of municipality or park 10district) .... Park District be authorized to levy an annual 11tax in excess of .... but not to exceed .... as authorized in 12Section 2 of the Park District and Municipal Aquarium and 13Museum Act "An Act concerning aquariums and museums in public 14parks" for the purpose of establishing, acquiring, completing, 15erecting, enlarging, ornamenting, building, rebuilding, 16rehabilitating, improving, operating, maintaining and caring 17for such aquariums and museum or museums and the buildings and 18grounds thereof?" The secretary of the park district or the 19clerk of the municipality shall certify the proposition to the 20proper election authorities for submission to the electorate 21at a regular scheduled election in accordance with the general 22election law. If a majority of the electors voting on the 23proposition vote in favor thereof, such increased tax shall 24thereafter be authorized; if a majority of the vote is against 25such proposition, the previous maximum rate shall remain in 26effect until changed by law.  HB2681- 9 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    Whenever the corporate authorities of a municipality with 2a population of less than 500,000 or the board of park 3commissioners of a park district with of a population of less 4than 500,000 adopts a resolution that it shall levy and 5collect a tax for the purposes specified in this Section in 6excess of 0.07% but not to exceed 0.15% of the value of taxable 7property in the district or municipality, the corporate 8authorities or board shall cause the resolution to be 9published, at least once, in a newspaper of general 10circulation within the district or municipality. If there is 11no such newspaper, the resolution shall be posted in at least 3 12public places within the district or municipality. A tax in 13excess of 0.07% may not be levied under this subsection until 14the question of levying the tax has been submitted to the 15electors of the park district or municipality at a regular 16election and approved by a majority of the electors voting on 17the question. The park district or municipality District must 18certify the question to the proper election authority, which 19must submit the question at an election in accordance with the 20Election Code. The election authority must submit the question 21in substantially the following form: 22        "Shall the (insert name of municipality or park 23    district) .... Park District be authorized to levy an 24    annual tax in excess of .... but not to exceed .... as 25    authorized in Section 2 of the Park District and Municipal 26    Aquarium and Museum Act "An Act concerning aquariums and   HB2681- 10 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    museums in public parks" for the purpose of establishing, 2    acquiring, completing, erecting, enlarging, ornamenting, 3    building, rebuilding, rehabilitating, improving, 4    operating, maintaining and caring for such aquariums and 5    museum or museums and the buildings and grounds thereof?".6    If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition 7vote in favor thereof, such increased tax shall thereafter be 8authorized. If a majority of the electors vote against the 9proposition, the previous maximum rate shall remain in effect 10until changed by law. 11(Source: P.A. 95-643, eff. 6-1-08.) 12    Section 15. The Chicago Park District Act is amended by 13changing Section 19 as follows: 14    (70 ILCS 1505/19)  (from Ch. 105, par. 333.19)15    Sec. 19. The Chicago Park District Commission is empowered 16to levy and collect a general tax on the property in the park 17district for necessary expenses of said district for the 18construction and maintenance of the parks and other 19improvements hereby authorized to be made, and for the 20acquisition and improvement of lands herein authorized to be 21purchased or acquired by any means provided for in this Act.22    The commissioners shall cause the amount to be raised by 23taxation in each year to be certified to the county clerk on or 24before March 30 of each year, in the manner provided by law and   HB2681- 11 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1all taxes so levied and certified shall be collected and 2enforced in the same manner and by the same officers as for 3State and county purposes. All such general taxes, when 4collected, shall be paid over to the proper officer of the 5commission who is authorized to receive and receipt for the 6same. All taxes authorized to be levied under this Act shall be 7levied annually prior to March 28 in the same manner as nearly 8as practicable as taxes are now levied for city and village 9purposes under the laws of this State. The aggregate amount of 10taxes so levied exclusive of levies for Park Employee's 11Annuity and Benefit Funds, Park Policemen's Pension Funds, 12Park Policemen's Annuity and Benefit Funds, levies to pay the 13principal of and interest on bonded indebtedness and judgments 14and levies for the maintenance and care of aquariums and 15museums in public parks shall not exceed a rate of .66 per cent 16for the year 1980 and each year thereafter of the full, fair 17cash value, as equalized or assessed by the Department of 18Revenue, of the taxable property in said district.19    For the purpose of establishing and maintaining a reserve 20fund for the payment of claims, awards, losses, judgments or 21liabilities which might be imposed on such park district under 22the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 23Diseases Act, such park district may also levy annually upon 24all taxable property within its territorial limits a tax not 25to exceed .005% of the full, fair cash value, as equalized or 26assessed by the Department of Revenue of the taxable property   HB2681- 12 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1in said district as equalized and determined for State and 2local taxes; provided, however, the aggregate amount which may 3be accumulated in such reserve fund shall not exceed .05% of 4such assessed valuation.5    If any of the park authorities superseded by this Act 6shall have levied and collected taxes under the Park District 7and Municipal Aquarium and Museum Act pursuant to the 8provisions of "An Act concerning aquariums and museums in 9public parks," approved June 17, 1893, as amended, the park 10commissioners of the Chicago Park District may continue to 11levy an annual tax pursuant to the provisions of such Act, but 12such tax levied by such commissioners shall not exceed a rate 13of .15 per cent, of the full, fair cash value as equalized or 14assessed by the Department of Revenue, of taxable property 15within such Chicago Park District and such tax shall be in 16addition to all other taxes which such park commissioners may 17levy. Said tax shall be levied and collected in like manner as 18the general taxes for such Park District and shall not be 19included within any limitation of rate for general park 20purposes as now or hereafter provided by law but shall be 21excluded therefrom and be in addition thereto and in excess 22thereof. The proceeds of such tax shall be kept as a separate 23fund.24    In addition, the treasurer of the Chicago Park District 25shall deposit 7.5340% of its receipts in each fiscal year from 26the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund in the State   HB2681- 13 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1treasury Treasury into such aquarium and museum fund for 2appropriation and disbursement of assets of such fund as if 3such receipts were property taxes made available pursuant to 4Section 2 of "An Act concerning aquariums and museums in 5public parks", approved June 17, 1893, as amended. This 6amendatory Act of 1983 is not intended to nor does it make any 7change in the meaning of any provision of this or any other Act 8but is intended to be declarative of existing law.9    The treasurer of the Chicago Park District shall deposit 100.03968% of its receipts in each fiscal year from the Personal 11Property Tax Replacement Fund in the State treasury Treasury 12into the Park Employee's Annuity and Benefit Fund.13(Source: P.A. 84-635.) 14    Section 20. The Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 is 15amended by changing Section 26 as follows: 16    (230 ILCS 5/26)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-26)17    Sec. 26. Wagering. 18    (a) Any licensee may conduct and supervise the pari-mutuel 19system of wagering, as defined in Section 3.12 of this Act, on 20horse races conducted by an Illinois organization licensee or 21conducted at a racetrack located in another state or country 22in accordance with subsection (g) of Section 26 of this Act. 23Subject to the prior consent of the Board, licensees may 24supplement any pari-mutuel pool in order to guarantee a   HB2681- 14 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1minimum distribution. Such pari-mutuel method of wagering 2shall not, under any circumstances if conducted under the 3provisions of this Act, be held or construed to be unlawful, 4other statutes of this State to the contrary notwithstanding. 5Subject to rules for advance wagering promulgated by the 6Board, any licensee may accept wagers in advance of the day the 7race wagered upon occurs.8    (b) Except for those gaming activities for which a license 9is obtained and authorized under the Illinois Lottery Law, the 10Charitable Games Act, the Raffles and Poker Runs Act, or the 11Illinois Gambling Act, no other method of betting, pool 12making, wagering or gambling shall be used or permitted by the 13licensee. Each licensee may retain, subject to the payment of 14all applicable taxes and purses, an amount not to exceed 17% of 15all money wagered under subsection (a) of this Section, except 16as may otherwise be permitted under this Act.17    (b-5) An individual may place a wager under the 18pari-mutuel system from any licensed location authorized under 19this Act provided that wager is electronically recorded in the 20manner described in Section 3.12 of this Act. Any wager made 21electronically by an individual while physically on the 22premises of a licensee shall be deemed to have been made at the 23premises of that licensee.24    (c) (Blank).25    (c-5) The sum held by any licensee for payment of 26outstanding pari-mutuel tickets, if unclaimed prior to   HB2681- 15 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1December 31 of the next year, shall be retained by the licensee 2for payment of such tickets until that date. Within 10 days 3thereafter, the balance of such sum remaining unclaimed, less 4any uncashed supplements contributed by such licensee for the 5purpose of guaranteeing minimum distributions of any 6pari-mutuel pool, shall be evenly distributed to the purse 7account of the organization licensee and the organization 8licensee, except that the balance of the sum of all 9outstanding pari-mutuel tickets generated from simulcast 10wagering and inter-track wagering by an organization licensee 11located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 12borders the Mississippi River or any licensee that derives its 13license from that organization licensee shall be evenly 14distributed to the purse account of the organization licensee 15and the organization licensee.16    (d) A pari-mutuel ticket shall be honored until December 1731 of the next calendar year, and the licensee shall pay the 18same and may charge the amount thereof against unpaid money 19similarly accumulated on account of pari-mutuel tickets not 20presented for payment.21    (e) No licensee shall knowingly permit any minor, other 22than an employee of such licensee or an owner, trainer, 23jockey, driver, or employee thereof, to be admitted during a 24racing program unless accompanied by a parent or guardian, or 25any minor to be a patron of the pari-mutuel system of wagering 26conducted or supervised by it. The admission of any   HB2681- 16 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1unaccompanied minor, other than an employee of the licensee or 2an owner, trainer, jockey, driver, or employee thereof at a 3race track is a Class C misdemeanor.4    (f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, an 5organization licensee may contract with an entity in another 6state or country to permit any legal wagering entity in 7another state or country to accept wagers solely within such 8other state or country on races conducted by the organization 9licensee in this State. Beginning January 1, 2000, these 10wagers shall not be subject to State taxation. Until January 111, 2000, when the out-of-State entity conducts a pari-mutuel 12pool separate from the organization licensee, a privilege tax 13equal to 7 1/2% of all monies received by the organization 14licensee from entities in other states or countries pursuant 15to such contracts is imposed on the organization licensee, and 16such privilege tax shall be remitted to the Department of 17Revenue within 48 hours of receipt of the moneys from the 18simulcast. When the out-of-State entity conducts a combined 19pari-mutuel pool with the organization licensee, the tax shall 20be 10% of all monies received by the organization licensee 21with 25% of the receipts from this 10% tax to be distributed to 22the county in which the race was conducted.23    An organization licensee may permit one or more of its 24races to be utilized for pari-mutuel wagering at one or more 25locations in other states and may transmit audio and visual 26signals of races the organization licensee conducts to one or   HB2681- 17 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1more locations outside the State or country and may also 2permit pari-mutuel pools in other states or countries to be 3combined with its gross or net wagering pools or with wagering 4pools established by other states.5    (g) A host track may accept interstate simulcast wagers on 6horse races conducted in other states or countries and shall 7control the number of signals and types of breeds of racing in 8its simulcast program, subject to the disapproval of the 9Board. The Board may prohibit a simulcast program only if it 10finds that the simulcast program is clearly adverse to the 11integrity of racing. The host track simulcast program shall 12include the signal of live racing of all organization 13licensees. All non-host licensees and advance deposit wagering 14licensees shall carry the signal of and accept wagers on live 15racing of all organization licensees. Advance deposit wagering 16licensees shall not be permitted to accept out-of-state wagers 17on any Illinois signal provided pursuant to this Section 18without the approval and consent of the organization licensee 19providing the signal. For one year after August 15, 2014 (the 20effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host licensees may 21carry the host track simulcast program and shall accept wagers 22on all races included as part of the simulcast program of horse 23races conducted at race tracks located within North America 24upon which wagering is permitted. For a period of one year 25after August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 2698-968), on horse races conducted at race tracks located   HB2681- 18 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1outside of North America, non-host licensees may accept wagers 2on all races included as part of the simulcast program upon 3which wagering is permitted. Beginning August 15, 2015 (one 4year after the effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host 5licensees may carry the host track simulcast program and shall 6accept wagers on all races included as part of the simulcast 7program upon which wagering is permitted. All organization 8licensees shall provide their live signal to all advance 9deposit wagering licensees for a simulcast commission fee not 10to exceed 6% of the advance deposit wagering licensee's 11Illinois handle on the organization licensee's signal without 12prior approval by the Board. The Board may adopt rules under 13which it may permit simulcast commission fees in excess of 6%. 14The Board shall adopt rules limiting the interstate commission 15fees charged to an advance deposit wagering licensee. The 16Board shall adopt rules regarding advance deposit wagering on 17interstate simulcast races that shall reflect, among other 18things, the General Assembly's desire to maximize revenues to 19the State, horsemen purses, and organization licensees. 20However, organization licensees providing live signals 21pursuant to the requirements of this subsection (g) may 22petition the Board to withhold their live signals from an 23advance deposit wagering licensee if the organization licensee 24discovers and the Board finds reputable or credible 25information that the advance deposit wagering licensee is 26under investigation by another state or federal governmental   HB2681- 19 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1agency, the advance deposit wagering licensee's license has 2been suspended in another state, or the advance deposit 3wagering licensee's license is in revocation proceedings in 4another state. The organization licensee's provision of their 5live signal to an advance deposit wagering licensee under this 6subsection (g) pertains to wagers placed from within Illinois. 7Advance deposit wagering licensees may place advance deposit 8wagering terminals at wagering facilities as a convenience to 9customers. The advance deposit wagering licensee shall not 10charge or collect any fee from purses for the placement of the 11advance deposit wagering terminals. The costs and expenses of 12the host track and non-host licensees associated with 13interstate simulcast wagering, other than the interstate 14commission fee, shall be borne by the host track and all 15non-host licensees incurring these costs. The interstate 16commission fee shall not exceed 5% of Illinois handle on the 17interstate simulcast race or races without prior approval of 18the Board. The Board shall promulgate rules under which it may 19permit interstate commission fees in excess of 5%. The 20interstate commission fee and other fees charged by the 21sending racetrack, including, but not limited to, satellite 22decoder fees, shall be uniformly applied to the host track and 23all non-host licensees.24    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, an 25organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 26association representing the largest number of owners,   HB2681- 20 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 2that organization licensee's racing meeting, may maintain a 3system whereby advance deposit wagering may take place or an 4organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 5association representing the largest number of owners, 6trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 7that organization licensee's racing meeting, may contract with 8another person to carry out a system of advance deposit 9wagering. Such consent may not be unreasonably withheld. Only 10with respect to an appeal to the Board that consent for an 11organization licensee that maintains its own advance deposit 12wagering system is being unreasonably withheld, the Board 13shall issue a final order within 30 days after initiation of 14the appeal, and the organization licensee's advance deposit 15wagering system may remain operational during that 30-day 16period. The actions of any organization licensee who conducts 17advance deposit wagering or any person who has a contract with 18an organization licensee to conduct advance deposit wagering 19who conducts advance deposit wagering on or after January 1, 202013 and prior to June 7, 2013 (the effective date of Public 21Act 98-18) taken in reliance on the changes made to this 22subsection (g) by Public Act 98-18 are hereby validated, 23provided payment of all applicable pari-mutuel taxes are 24remitted to the Board. All advance deposit wagers placed from 25within Illinois must be placed through a Board-approved 26advance deposit wagering licensee; no other entity may accept   HB2681- 21 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1an advance deposit wager from a person within Illinois. All 2advance deposit wagering is subject to any rules adopted by 3the Board. The Board may adopt rules necessary to regulate 4advance deposit wagering through the use of emergency 5rulemaking in accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois 6Administrative Procedure Act. The General Assembly finds that 7the adoption of rules to regulate advance deposit wagering is 8deemed an emergency and necessary for the public interest, 9safety, and welfare. An advance deposit wagering licensee may 10retain all moneys as agreed to by contract with an 11organization licensee. Any moneys retained by the organization 12licensee from advance deposit wagering, not including moneys 13retained by the advance deposit wagering licensee, shall be 14paid 50% to the organization licensee's purse account and 50% 15to the organization licensee. With the exception of any 16organization licensee that is owned by a publicly traded 17company that is incorporated in a state other than Illinois 18and advance deposit wagering licensees under contract with 19such organization licensees, organization licensees that 20maintain advance deposit wagering systems and advance deposit 21wagering licensees that contract with organization licensees 22shall provide sufficiently detailed monthly accountings to the 23horsemen association representing the largest number of 24owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race 25horses at that organization licensee's racing meeting so that 26the horsemen association, as an interested party, can confirm   HB2681- 22 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1the accuracy of the amounts paid to the purse account at the 2horsemen association's affiliated organization licensee from 3advance deposit wagering. If more than one breed races at the 4same race track facility, then the 50% of the moneys to be paid 5to an organization licensee's purse account shall be allocated 6among all organization licensees' purse accounts operating at 7that race track facility proportionately based on the actual 8number of host days that the Board grants to that breed at that 9race track facility in the current calendar year. To the 10extent any fees from advance deposit wagering conducted in 11Illinois for wagers in Illinois or other states have been 12placed in escrow or otherwise withheld from wagers pending a 13determination of the legality of advance deposit wagering, no 14action shall be brought to declare such wagers or the 15disbursement of any fees previously escrowed illegal.16        (1) Between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. an 17    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 18    may supplement the host track simulcast program with 19    additional simulcast races or race programs, provided that 20    between January 1 and the third Friday in February of any 21    year, inclusive, if no live thoroughbred racing is 22    occurring in Illinois during this period, only 23    thoroughbred races may be used for supplemental interstate 24    simulcast purposes. The Board shall withhold approval for 25    a supplemental interstate simulcast only if it finds that 26    the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of   HB2681- 23 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    racing. A supplemental interstate simulcast may be 2    transmitted from an inter-track wagering licensee to its 3    affiliated non-host licensees. The interstate commission 4    fee for a supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid 5    by the non-host licensee and its affiliated non-host 6    licensees receiving the simulcast.7        (2) Between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. an 8    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 9    may receive supplemental interstate simulcasts only with 10    the consent of the host track, except when the Board finds 11    that the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of 12    racing. Consent granted under this paragraph (2) to any 13    inter-track wagering licensee shall be deemed consent to 14    all non-host licensees. The interstate commission fee for 15    the supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid by all 16    participating non-host licensees.17        (3) Each licensee conducting interstate simulcast 18    wagering may retain, subject to the payment of all 19    applicable taxes and the purses, an amount not to exceed 20    17% of all money wagered. If any licensee conducts the 21    pari-mutuel system wagering on races conducted at 22    racetracks in another state or country, each such race or 23    race program shall be considered a separate racing day for 24    the purpose of determining the daily handle and computing 25    the privilege tax of that daily handle as provided in 26    subsection (a) of Section 27. Until January 1, 2000, from   HB2681- 24 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to this 2    subsection, each inter-track wagering location licensee 3    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 4    simulcast wagering to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation 5    Fund, subject to the provisions of subparagraph (B) of 6    paragraph (11) of subsection (h) of Section 26 of this 7    Act.8        (4) A licensee who receives an interstate simulcast 9    may combine its gross or net pools with pools at the 10    sending racetracks pursuant to rules established by the 11    Board. All licensees combining their gross pools at a 12    sending racetrack shall adopt the takeout percentages of 13    the sending racetrack. A licensee may also establish a 14    separate pool and takeout structure for wagering purposes 15    on races conducted at race tracks outside of the State of 16    Illinois. The licensee may permit pari-mutuel wagers 17    placed in other states or countries to be combined with 18    its gross or net wagering pools or other wagering pools.19        (5) After the payment of the interstate commission fee 20    (except for the interstate commission fee on a 21    supplemental interstate simulcast, which shall be paid by 22    the host track and by each non-host licensee through the 23    host track) and all applicable State and local taxes, 24    except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27 of this 25    Act, the remainder of moneys retained from simulcast 26    wagering pursuant to this subsection (g), and Section 26.2   HB2681- 25 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    shall be divided as follows:2            (A) For interstate simulcast wagers made at a host 3        track, 50% to the host track and 50% to purses at the 4        host track.5            (B) For wagers placed on interstate simulcast 6        races, supplemental simulcasts as defined in 7        subparagraphs (1) and (2), and separately pooled races 8        conducted outside of the State of Illinois made at a 9        non-host licensee, 25% to the host track, 25% to the 10        non-host licensee, and 50% to the purses at the host 11        track.12        (6) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 13    contrary, non-host licensees who derive their licenses 14    from a track located in a county with a population in 15    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 16    may receive supplemental interstate simulcast races at all 17    times subject to Board approval, which shall be withheld 18    only upon a finding that a supplemental interstate 19    simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of racing.20        (7) Effective January 1, 2017, notwithstanding any 21    provision of this Act to the contrary, after payment of 22    all applicable State and local taxes and interstate 23    commission fees, non-host licensees who derive their 24    licenses from a track located in a county with a 25    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 26    Mississippi River shall retain 50% of the retention from   HB2681- 26 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    interstate simulcast wagers and shall pay 50% to purses at 2    the track from which the non-host licensee derives its 3    license.4        (7.1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 5    to the contrary, if no standardbred racing is conducted at 6    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 7    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, all moneys 8    derived by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and 9    inter-track wagering that (1) are to be used for purses 10    and (2) are generated between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 11    6:30 a.m. during that calendar year shall be paid as 12    follows:13            (A) If the licensee that conducts horse racing at 14        that racetrack requests from the Board at least as 15        many racing dates as were conducted in calendar year 16        2000, 80% shall be paid to its thoroughbred purse 17        account; and18            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 19        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund and shall 20        be paid to purses for standardbred races for Illinois 21        conceived and foaled horses conducted at any county 22        fairgrounds. The moneys deposited into the Fund 23        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 24        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated, 25        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 26        moneys paid to standardbred purses under this Act, and   HB2681- 27 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        shall not be commingled with other moneys paid into 2        that Fund. The moneys deposited pursuant to this 3        subparagraph (B) shall be allocated as provided by the 4        Department of Agriculture, with the advice and 5        assistance of the Illinois Standardbred Breeders Fund 6        Advisory Board.7        (7.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 8    to the contrary, if no thoroughbred racing is conducted at 9    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 10    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, all moneys 11    derived by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and 12    inter-track wagering that (1) are to be used for purses 13    and (2) are generated between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 14    6:30 p.m. during that calendar year shall be deposited as 15    follows:16            (A) If the licensee that conducts horse racing at 17        that racetrack requests from the Board at least as 18        many racing dates as were conducted in calendar year 19        2000, 80% shall be deposited into its standardbred 20        purse account; and21            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 22        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund. Moneys 23        deposited into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse 24        Distribution Fund pursuant to this subparagraph (B) 25        shall be paid to Illinois conceived and foaled 26        thoroughbred breeders' programs and to thoroughbred   HB2681- 28 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        purses for races conducted at any county fairgrounds 2        for Illinois conceived and foaled horses at the 3        discretion of the Department of Agriculture, with the 4        advice and assistance of the Illinois Thoroughbred 5        Breeders Fund Advisory Board. The moneys deposited 6        into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund 7        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 8        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated, 9        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 10        moneys paid to thoroughbred purses under this Act, and 11        shall not be commingled with other moneys deposited 12        into that Fund.13        (8) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 14    contrary, an organization licensee from a track located in 15    a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 16    borders the Mississippi River and its affiliated non-host 17    licensees shall not be entitled to share in any retention 18    generated on racing, inter-track wagering, or simulcast 19    wagering at any other Illinois wagering facility.20        (8.1) Notwithstanding any provisions in this Act to 21    the contrary, if 2 organization licensees are conducting 22    standardbred race meetings concurrently between the hours 23    of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m., after payment of all 24    applicable State and local taxes and interstate commission 25    fees, the remainder of the amount retained from simulcast 26    wagering otherwise attributable to the host track and to   HB2681- 29 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    host track purses shall be split daily between the 2 2    organization licensees and the purses at the tracks of the 3    2 organization licensees, respectively, based on each 4    organization licensee's share of the total live handle for 5    that day, provided that this provision shall not apply to 6    any non-host licensee that derives its license from a 7    track located in a county with a population in excess of 8    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River.9        (9) (Blank).10        (10) (Blank).11        (11) (Blank).12        (12) The Board shall have authority to compel all host 13    tracks to receive the simulcast of any or all races 14    conducted at the Springfield or DuQuoin State fairgrounds 15    and include all such races as part of their simulcast 16    programs.17        (13) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 18    in the event that the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 19    Illinois horse races at all wagering facilities in any 20    calendar year is less than 75% of the total Illinois 21    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races at all such 22    wagering facilities for calendar year 1994, then each 23    wagering facility that has an annual total Illinois 24    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races that is less 25    than 75% of the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 26    Illinois horse races at such wagering facility for   HB2681- 30 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    calendar year 1994, shall be permitted to receive, from 2    any amount otherwise payable to the purse account at the 3    race track with which the wagering facility is affiliated 4    in the succeeding calendar year, an amount equal to 2% of 5    the differential in total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 6    Illinois horse races at the wagering facility between that 7    calendar year in question and 1994 provided, however, that 8    a wagering facility shall not be entitled to any such 9    payment until the Board certifies in writing to the 10    wagering facility the amount to which the wagering 11    facility is entitled and a schedule for payment of the 12    amount to the wagering facility, based on: (i) the racing 13    dates awarded to the race track affiliated with the 14    wagering facility during the succeeding year; (ii) the 15    sums available or anticipated to be available in the purse 16    account of the race track affiliated with the wagering 17    facility for purses during the succeeding year; and (iii) 18    the need to ensure reasonable purse levels during the 19    payment period. The Board's certification shall be 20    provided no later than January 31 of the succeeding year. 21    In the event a wagering facility entitled to a payment 22    under this paragraph (13) is affiliated with a race track 23    that maintains purse accounts for both standardbred and 24    thoroughbred racing, the amount to be paid to the wagering 25    facility shall be divided between each purse account pro 26    rata, based on the amount of Illinois handle on Illinois   HB2681- 31 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    standardbred and thoroughbred racing respectively at the 2    wagering facility during the previous calendar year. 3    Annually, the General Assembly shall appropriate 4    sufficient funds from the General Revenue Fund to the 5    Department of Agriculture for payment into the 6    thoroughbred and standardbred horse racing purse accounts 7    at Illinois pari-mutuel tracks. The amount paid to each 8    purse account shall be the amount certified by the 9    Illinois Racing Board in January to be transferred from 10    each account to each eligible racing facility in 11    accordance with the provisions of this Section. Beginning 12    in the calendar year in which an organization licensee 13    that is eligible to receive payment under this paragraph 14    (13) begins to receive funds from gaming pursuant to an 15    organization gaming license issued under the Illinois 16    Gambling Act, the amount of the payment due to all 17    wagering facilities licensed under that organization 18    licensee under this paragraph (13) shall be the amount 19    certified by the Board in January of that year. An 20    organization licensee and its related wagering facilities 21    shall no longer be able to receive payments under this 22    paragraph (13) beginning in the year subsequent to the 23    first year in which the organization licensee begins to 24    receive funds from gaming pursuant to an organization 25    gaming license issued under the Illinois Gambling Act.26    (h) The Board may approve and license the conduct of   HB2681- 32 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 2wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location licensees 3subject to the following terms and conditions:4        (1) Any person licensed to conduct a race meeting (i) 5    at a track where 60 or more days of racing were conducted 6    during the immediately preceding calendar year or where 7    over the 5 immediately preceding calendar years an average 8    of 30 or more days of racing were conducted annually may be 9    issued an inter-track wagering license; (ii) at a track 10    located in a county that is bounded by the Mississippi 11    River, which has a population of less than 150,000 12    according to the 1990 decennial census, and an average of 13    at least 60 days of racing per year between 1985 and 1993 14    may be issued an inter-track wagering license; (iii) at a 15    track awarded standardbred racing dates; or (iv) at a 16    track located in Madison County that conducted at least 17    100 days of live racing during the immediately preceding 18    calendar year may be issued an inter-track wagering 19    license, unless a lesser schedule of live racing is the 20    result of (A) weather, unsafe track conditions, or other 21    acts of God; (B) an agreement between the organization 22    licensee and the associations representing the largest 23    number of owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred 24    drivers who race horses at that organization licensee's 25    racing meeting; or (C) a finding by the Board of 26    extraordinary circumstances and that it was in the best   HB2681- 33 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    interest of the public and the sport to conduct fewer than 2    100 days of live racing. Any such person having operating 3    control of the racing facility may receive inter-track 4    wagering location licenses. An eligible race track located 5    in a county that has a population of more than 230,000 and 6    that is bounded by the Mississippi River may establish up 7    to 9 inter-track wagering locations, an eligible race 8    track located in Stickney Township in Cook County may 9    establish up to 16 inter-track wagering locations, and an 10    eligible race track located in Palatine Township in Cook 11    County may establish up to 18 inter-track wagering 12    locations. An eligible racetrack conducting standardbred 13    racing may have up to 16 inter-track wagering locations. 14    An application for said license shall be filed with the 15    Board prior to such dates as may be fixed by the Board. 16    With an application for an inter-track wagering location 17    license there shall be delivered to the Board a certified 18    check or bank draft payable to the order of the Board for 19    an amount equal to $500. The application shall be on forms 20    prescribed and furnished by the Board. The application 21    shall comply with all other rules, regulations and 22    conditions imposed by the Board in connection therewith.23        (2) The Board shall examine the applications with 24    respect to their conformity with this Act and the rules 25    and regulations imposed by the Board. If found to be in 26    compliance with the Act and rules and regulations of the   HB2681- 34 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    Board, the Board may then issue a license to conduct 2    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering to such 3    applicant. All such applications shall be acted upon by 4    the Board at a meeting to be held on such date as may be 5    fixed by the Board.6        (3) In granting licenses to conduct inter-track 7    wagering and simulcast wagering, the Board shall give due 8    consideration to the best interests of the public, of 9    horse racing, and of maximizing revenue to the State.10        (4) Prior to the issuance of a license to conduct 11    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering, the applicant 12    shall file with the Board a bond payable to the State of 13    Illinois in the sum of $50,000, executed by the applicant 14    and a surety company or companies authorized to do 15    business in this State, and conditioned upon (i) the 16    payment by the licensee of all taxes due under Section 27 17    or 27.1 and any other monies due and payable under this 18    Act, and (ii) distribution by the licensee, upon 19    presentation of the winning ticket or tickets, of all sums 20    payable to the patrons of pari-mutuel pools.21        (5) Each license to conduct inter-track wagering and 22    simulcast wagering shall specify the person to whom it is 23    issued, the dates on which such wagering is permitted, and 24    the track or location where the wagering is to be 25    conducted.26        (6) All wagering under such license is subject to this   HB2681- 35 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    Act and to the rules and regulations from time to time 2    prescribed by the Board, and every such license issued by 3    the Board shall contain a recital to that effect.4        (7) An inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track 5    wagering location licensee may accept wagers at the track 6    or location where it is licensed, or as otherwise provided 7    under this Act.8        (8) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 9    not be conducted at any track less than 4 miles from a 10    track at which a racing meeting is in progress.11        (8.1) Inter-track wagering location licensees who 12    derive their licenses from a particular organization 13    licensee shall conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 14    wagering only at locations that are within 160 miles of 15    that race track where the particular organization licensee 16    is licensed to conduct racing. However, inter-track 17    wagering and simulcast wagering shall not be conducted by 18    those licensees at any location within 5 miles of any race 19    track at which a horse race meeting has been licensed in 20    the current year, unless the person having operating 21    control of such race track has given its written consent 22    to such inter-track wagering location licensees, which 23    consent must be filed with the Board at or prior to the 24    time application is made. In the case of any inter-track 25    wagering location licensee initially licensed after 26    December 31, 2013, inter-track wagering and simulcast   HB2681- 36 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    wagering shall not be conducted by those inter-track 2    wagering location licensees that are located outside the 3    City of Chicago at any location within 8 miles of any race 4    track at which a horse race meeting has been licensed in 5    the current year, unless the person having operating 6    control of such race track has given its written consent 7    to such inter-track wagering location licensees, which 8    consent must be filed with the Board at or prior to the 9    time application is made. 10        (8.2) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 11    not be conducted by an inter-track wagering location 12    licensee at any location within 100 feet of an existing 13    church, an existing elementary or secondary public school, 14    or an existing elementary or secondary private school 15    registered with or recognized by the State Board of 16    Education. The distance of 100 feet shall be measured to 17    the nearest part of any building used for worship 18    services, education programs, or conducting inter-track 19    wagering by an inter-track wagering location licensee, and 20    not to property boundaries. However, inter-track wagering 21    or simulcast wagering may be conducted at a site within 22    100 feet of a church or school if such church or school has 23    been erected or established after the Board issues the 24    original inter-track wagering location license at the site 25    in question. Inter-track wagering location licensees may 26    conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering only   HB2681- 37 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    in areas that are zoned for commercial or manufacturing 2    purposes or in areas for which a special use has been 3    approved by the local zoning authority. However, no 4    license to conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 5    wagering shall be granted by the Board with respect to any 6    inter-track wagering location within the jurisdiction of 7    any local zoning authority which has, by ordinance or by 8    resolution, prohibited the establishment of an inter-track 9    wagering location within its jurisdiction. However, 10    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering may be 11    conducted at a site if such ordinance or resolution is 12    enacted after the Board licenses the original inter-track 13    wagering location licensee for the site in question.14        (9) (Blank).15        (10) An inter-track wagering licensee or an 16    inter-track wagering location licensee may retain, subject 17    to the payment of the privilege taxes and the purses, an 18    amount not to exceed 17% of all money wagered. Each 19    program of racing conducted by each inter-track wagering 20    licensee or inter-track wagering location licensee shall 21    be considered a separate racing day for the purpose of 22    determining the daily handle and computing the privilege 23    tax or pari-mutuel tax on such daily handle as provided in 24    Section 27.25        (10.1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 26    27 of this Act, inter-track wagering location licensees   HB2681- 38 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to 2    the municipality in which such location is situated and 1% 3    of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to the county 4    in which such location is situated. In the event that an 5    inter-track wagering location licensee is situated in an 6    unincorporated area of a county, such licensee shall pay 7    2% of the pari-mutuel handle from such location to such 8    county. Inter-track wagering location licensees must pay 9    the handle percentage required under this paragraph to the 10    municipality and county no later than the 20th of the 11    month following the month such handle was generated.12        (10.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 13    Act, with respect to inter-track wagering at a race track 14    located in a county that has a population of more than 15    230,000 and that is bounded by the Mississippi River ("the 16    first race track"), or at a facility operated by an 17    inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track wagering 18    location licensee that derives its license from the 19    organization licensee that operates the first race track, 20    on races conducted at the first race track or on races 21    conducted at another Illinois race track and 22    simultaneously televised to the first race track or to a 23    facility operated by an inter-track wagering licensee or 24    inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its 25    license from the organization licensee that operates the 26    first race track, those moneys shall be allocated as   HB2681- 39 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    follows:2            (A) That portion of all moneys wagered on 3        standardbred racing that is required under this Act to 4        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 5        standardbred races.6            (B) That portion of all moneys wagered on 7        thoroughbred racing that is required under this Act to 8        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 9        thoroughbred races.10        (11) (A) After payment of the privilege or pari-mutuel 11    tax, any other applicable taxes, and the costs and 12    expenses in connection with the gathering, transmission, 13    and dissemination of all data necessary to the conduct of 14    inter-track wagering, the remainder of the monies retained 15    under either Section 26 or Section 26.2 of this Act by the 16    inter-track wagering licensee on inter-track wagering 17    shall be allocated with 50% to be split between the 2 18    participating licensees and 50% to purses, except that an 19    inter-track wagering licensee that derives its license 20    from a track located in a county with a population in 21    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 22    shall not divide any remaining retention with the Illinois 23    organization licensee that provides the race or races, and 24    an inter-track wagering licensee that accepts wagers on 25    races conducted by an organization licensee that conducts 26    a race meet in a county with a population in excess of   HB2681- 40 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River shall not 2    divide any remaining retention with that organization 3    licensee.4        (B) From the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to 5    this Act each inter-track wagering location licensee shall 6    pay (i) the privilege or pari-mutuel tax to the State; 7    (ii) 4.75% of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track 8    wagering at such location on races as purses, except that 9    an inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its 10    license from a track located in a county with a population 11    in excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi 12    River shall retain all purse moneys for its own purse 13    account consistent with distribution set forth in this 14    subsection (h), and inter-track wagering location 15    licensees that accept wagers on races conducted by an 16    organization licensee located in a county with a 17    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 18    Mississippi River shall distribute all purse moneys to 19    purses at the operating host track; (iii) until January 1, 20    2000, except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27 21    of this Act, 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 22    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering at each 23    inter-track wagering location licensee facility to the 24    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund, provided that, to the 25    extent the total amount collected and distributed to the 26    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund under this subsection (h)   HB2681- 41 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    during any calendar year exceeds the amount collected and 2    distributed to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund during 3    calendar year 1994, that excess amount shall be 4    redistributed (I) to all inter-track wagering location 5    licensees, based on each licensee's pro rata share of the 6    total handle from inter-track wagering and simulcast 7    wagering for all inter-track wagering location licensees 8    during the calendar year in which this provision is 9    applicable; then (II) the amounts redistributed to each 10    inter-track wagering location licensee as described in 11    subpart (I) shall be further redistributed as provided in 12    subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of 13    this Section 26 provided first, that the shares of those 14    amounts, which are to be redistributed to the host track 15    or to purses at the host track under subparagraph (B) of 16    paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of this Section 26 shall 17    be redistributed based on each host track's pro rata share 18    of the total inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering 19    handle at all host tracks during the calendar year in 20    question, and second, that any amounts redistributed as 21    described in part (I) to an inter-track wagering location 22    licensee that accepts wagers on races conducted by an 23    organization licensee that conducts a race meet in a 24    county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 25    borders the Mississippi River shall be further 26    redistributed, effective January 1, 2017, as provided in   HB2681- 42 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    paragraph (7) of subsection (g) of this Section 26, with 2    the portion of that further redistribution allocated to 3    purses at that organization licensee to be divided between 4    standardbred purses and thoroughbred purses based on the 5    amounts otherwise allocated to purses at that organization 6    licensee during the calendar year in question; and (iv) 8% 7    of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track wagering wagered 8    at such location to satisfy all costs and expenses of 9    conducting its wagering. The remainder of the monies 10    retained by the inter-track wagering location licensee 11    shall be allocated 40% to the location licensee and 60% to 12    the organization licensee which provides the Illinois 13    races to the location, except that an inter-track wagering 14    location licensee that derives its license from a track 15    located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 16    and that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide 17    any remaining retention with the organization licensee 18    that provides the race or races and an inter-track 19    wagering location licensee that accepts wagers on races 20    conducted by an organization licensee that conducts a race 21    meet in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 22    that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide any 23    remaining retention with the organization licensee. 24    Notwithstanding the provisions of clauses (ii) and (iv) of 25    this paragraph, in the case of the additional inter-track 26    wagering location licenses authorized under paragraph (1)   HB2681- 43 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    of this subsection (h) by Public Act 87-110, those 2    licensees shall pay the following amounts as purses: 3    during the first 12 months the licensee is in operation, 4    5.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location on 5    races; during the second 12 months, 5.25%; during the 6    third 12 months, 5.75%; during the fourth 12 months, 7    6.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 8    6.75%. The following amounts shall be retained by the 9    licensee to satisfy all costs and expenses of conducting 10    its wagering: during the first 12 months the licensee is 11    in operation, 8.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at 12    the location; during the second 12 months, 8.25%; during 13    the third 12 months, 7.75%; during the fourth 12 months, 14    7.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 15    6.75%. For additional inter-track wagering location 16    licensees authorized under Public Act 89-16, purses for 17    the first 12 months the licensee is in operation shall be 18    5.75% of the pari-mutuel wagered at the location, purses 19    for the second 12 months the licensee is in operation 20    shall be 6.25%, and purses thereafter shall be 6.75%. For 21    additional inter-track location licensees authorized under 22    Public Act 89-16, the licensee shall be allowed to retain 23    to satisfy all costs and expenses: 7.75% of the 24    pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location during its 25    first 12 months of operation, 7.25% during its second 12 26    months of operation, and 6.75% thereafter.  HB2681- 44 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        (C) There is hereby created the Horse Racing Tax 2    Allocation Fund which shall remain in existence until 3    December 31, 1999. Moneys remaining in the Fund after 4    December 31, 1999 shall be paid into the General Revenue 5    Fund. Until January 1, 2000, all monies paid into the 6    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this 7    paragraph (11) by inter-track wagering location licensees 8    located in park districts of 500,000 population or less, 9    or in a municipality that is not included within any park 10    district but is included within a conservation district 11    and is the county seat of a county that (i) is contiguous 12    to the state of Indiana and (ii) has a 1990 population of 13    88,257 according to the United States Bureau of the 14    Census, and operating on May 1, 1994 shall be allocated by 15    appropriation as follows:16            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 17        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 18        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding 19        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 20        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee 21        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 22        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 23        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 24        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in 25        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 26        representatives of organization licensees conducting   HB2681- 45 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 2        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 3        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 4        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 5        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 6        Association, recommended by that Association; a 7        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 8        Protective Association or any successor organization 9        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 10        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by 11        that Association or that successor organization; and a 12        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's 13        Association, recommended by that Association. 14        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 15        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 16        representative of any of the above-named entities has 17        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 18        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to 19        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 20        compensation for their services as members but shall 21        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 22        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 23        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 24        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for 25        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 26        Agricultural Fair Act;  HB2681- 46 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1            Four-sevenths to park districts or municipalities 2        that do not have a park district of 500,000 population 3        or less for museum purposes (if an inter-track 4        wagering location licensee is located in such a park 5        district) or to conservation districts for museum 6        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee 7        is located in a municipality that is not included 8        within any park district but is included within a 9        conservation district and is the county seat of a 10        county that (i) is contiguous to the state of Indiana 11        and (ii) has a 1990 population of 88,257 according to 12        the United States Bureau of the Census, except that if 13        the conservation district does not maintain a museum, 14        the monies shall be allocated equally between the 15        county and the municipality in which the inter-track 16        wagering location licensee is located for general 17        purposes) or to a municipal recreation board for park 18        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee 19        is located in a municipality that is not included 20        within any park district and park maintenance is the 21        function of the municipal recreation board and the 22        municipality has a 1990 population of 9,302 according 23        to the United States Bureau of the Census); provided 24        that the monies are distributed to each park district 25        or conservation district or municipality that does not 26        have a park district in an amount equal to   HB2681- 47 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        four-sevenths of the amount collected by each 2        inter-track wagering location licensee within the park 3        district or conservation district or municipality for 4        the Fund. Monies that were paid into the Horse Racing 5        Tax Allocation Fund before August 9, 1991 (the 6        effective date of Public Act 87-110) by an inter-track 7        wagering location licensee located in a municipality 8        that is not included within any park district but is 9        included within a conservation district as provided in 10        this paragraph shall, as soon as practicable after 11        August 9, 1991 (the effective date of Public Act 12        87-110), be allocated and paid to that conservation 13        district as provided in this paragraph. Any park 14        district or municipality not maintaining a museum may 15        deposit the monies in the corporate fund of the park 16        district or municipality where the inter-track 17        wagering location is located, to be used for general 18        purposes; and19            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 20        used for distribution to agricultural home economics 21        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 22        relation to additional support and finances for the 23        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in 24        the several counties of this State and making an 25        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967.26        Until January 1, 2000, all other monies paid into the   HB2681- 48 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this 2    paragraph (11) shall be allocated by appropriation as 3    follows:4            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 5        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 6        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding 7        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 8        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee 9        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 10        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 11        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 12        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in 13        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 14        representatives of organization licensees conducting 15        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 16        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 17        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 18        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 19        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 20        Association, recommended by that Association; a 21        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 22        Protective Association or any successor organization 23        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 24        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by 25        that Association or that successor organization; and a 26        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's   HB2681- 49 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        Association, recommended by that Association. 2        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 3        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 4        representative of any of the above-named entities has 5        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 6        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to 7        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 8        compensation for their services as members but shall 9        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 10        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 11        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 12        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for 13        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 14        Agricultural Fair Act;15            Four-sevenths to museums and aquariums located in 16        park districts of over 500,000 population; provided 17        that the monies are distributed in accordance with the 18        previous year's distribution of the maintenance tax 19        for such museums and aquariums as provided in Section 20        2 of the Park District and Municipal Aquarium and 21        Museum Act; and22            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 23        used for distribution to agricultural home economics 24        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 25        relation to additional support and finances for the 26        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in   HB2681- 50 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        the several counties of this State and making an 2        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967. This 3        subparagraph (C) shall be inoperative and of no force 4        and effect on and after January 1, 2000.5            (D) Except as provided in paragraph (11) of this 6        subsection (h), with respect to purse allocation from 7        inter-track wagering, the monies so retained shall be 8        divided as follows:9                (i) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 10            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 11            derives its license from an organization licensee 12            located in a county with a population in excess of 13            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 14            not conducting its own race meeting during the 15            same dates, then the entire purse allocation shall 16            be to purses at the track where the races wagered 17            on are being conducted.18                (ii) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 19            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 20            derives its license from an organization licensee 21            located in a county with a population in excess of 22            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 23            also conducting its own race meeting during the 24            same dates, then the purse allocation shall be as 25            follows: 50% to purses at the track where the 26            races wagered on are being conducted; 50% to   HB2681- 51 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1            purses at the track where the inter-track wagering 2            licensee is accepting such wagers.3                (iii) If the inter-track wagering is being 4            conducted by an inter-track wagering location 5            licensee, except an inter-track wagering location 6            licensee that derives its license from an 7            organization licensee located in a county with a 8            population in excess of 230,000 and bounded by the 9            Mississippi River, the entire purse allocation for 10            Illinois races shall be to purses at the track 11            where the race meeting being wagered on is being 12            held.13        (12) The Board shall have all powers necessary and 14    proper to fully supervise and control the conduct of 15    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 16    wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location 17    licensees, including, but not limited to, the following:18            (A) The Board is vested with power to promulgate 19        reasonable rules and regulations for the purpose of 20        administering the conduct of this wagering and to 21        prescribe reasonable rules, regulations and conditions 22        under which such wagering shall be held and conducted. 23        Such rules and regulations are to provide for the 24        prevention of practices detrimental to the public 25        interest and for the best interests of said wagering 26        and to impose penalties for violations thereof.  HB2681- 52 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1            (B) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 2        delegates this power, is vested with the power to 3        enter the facilities of any licensee to determine 4        whether there has been compliance with the provisions 5        of this Act and the rules and regulations relating to 6        the conduct of such wagering.7            (C) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 8        delegates this power, may eject or exclude from any 9        licensee's facilities, any person whose conduct or 10        reputation is such that his presence on such premises 11        may, in the opinion of the Board, call into the 12        question the honesty and integrity of, or interfere 13        with the orderly conduct of such wagering; provided, 14        however, that no person shall be excluded or ejected 15        from such premises solely on the grounds of race, 16        color, creed, national origin, ancestry, or sex.17            (D) (Blank).18            (E) The Board is vested with the power to appoint 19        delegates to execute any of the powers granted to it 20        under this Section for the purpose of administering 21        this wagering and any rules and regulations 22        promulgated in accordance with this Act.23            (F) The Board shall name and appoint a State 24        director of this wagering who shall be a 25        representative of the Board and whose duty it shall be 26        to supervise the conduct of inter-track wagering as   HB2681- 53 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1        may be provided for by the rules and regulations of the 2        Board; such rules and regulation shall specify the 3        method of appointment and the Director's powers, 4        authority and duties.5            (G) The Board is vested with the power to impose 6        civil penalties of up to $5,000 against individuals 7        and up to $10,000 against licensees for each violation 8        of any provision of this Act relating to the conduct of 9        this wagering, any rules adopted by the Board, any 10        order of the Board or any other action which in the 11        Board's discretion, is a detriment or impediment to 12        such wagering.13        (13) The Department of Agriculture may enter into 14    agreements with licensees authorizing such licensees to 15    conduct inter-track wagering on races to be held at the 16    licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 17    Agriculture. Such agreement shall specify the races of the 18    Department of Agriculture's licensed race meeting upon 19    which the licensees will conduct wagering. In the event 20    that a licensee conducts inter-track pari-mutuel wagering 21    on races from the Illinois State Fair or DuQuoin State 22    Fair which are in addition to the licensee's previously 23    approved racing program, those races shall be considered a 24    separate racing day for the purpose of determining the 25    daily handle and computing the privilege or pari-mutuel 26    tax on that daily handle as provided in Sections 27 and   HB2681- 54 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    27.1. Such agreements shall be approved by the Board 2    before such wagering may be conducted. In determining 3    whether to grant approval, the Board shall give due 4    consideration to the best interests of the public and of 5    horse racing. The provisions of paragraphs (1), (8), 6    (8.1), and (8.2) of subsection (h) of this Section which 7    are not specified in this paragraph (13) shall not apply 8    to licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 9    Agriculture at the Illinois State Fair in Sangamon County 10    or the DuQuoin State Fair in Perry County, or to any 11    wagering conducted on those race meetings.12        (14) An inter-track wagering location license 13    authorized by the Board in 2016 that is owned and operated 14    by a race track in Rock Island County shall be transferred 15    to a commonly owned race track in Cook County on August 12, 16    2016 (the effective date of Public Act 99-757). The 17    licensee shall retain its status in relation to purse 18    distribution under paragraph (11) of this subsection (h) 19    following the transfer to the new entity. The pari-mutuel 20    tax credit under Section 32.1 shall not be applied toward 21    any pari-mutuel tax obligation of the inter-track wagering 22    location licensee of the license that is transferred under 23    this paragraph (14).24    (i) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, the 25conduct of wagering at wagering facilities is authorized on 26all days, except as limited by subsection (b) of Section 19 of   HB2681- 55 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1this Act.2(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-52, eff. 7-12-19; 3101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 48-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 5    Section 25. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by changing 6Section 15-5-15 as follows: 7    (735 ILCS 30/15-5-15)8    Sec. 15-5-15. Eminent domain powers in ILCS Chapters 70 9through 75. The following provisions of law may include 10express grants of the power to acquire property by 11condemnation or eminent domain: 12(70 ILCS 5/8.02 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 13    authorities; for public airport facilities.14(70 ILCS 5/8.05 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 15    authorities; for removal of airport hazards.16(70 ILCS 5/8.06 and 5/9); Airport Authorities Act; airport 17    authorities; for reduction of the height of objects or 18    structures.19(70 ILCS 10/4); Interstate Airport Authorities Act; interstate 20    airport authorities; for general purposes.21(70 ILCS 15/3); Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority 22    Act; Kankakee River Valley Area Airport Authority; for 23    acquisition of land for airports.  HB2681- 56 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1(70 ILCS 200/2-20); Civic Center Code; civic center 2    authorities; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.3(70 ILCS 200/5-35); Civic Center Code; Aledo Civic Center 4    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.5(70 ILCS 200/10-15); Civic Center Code; Aurora Metropolitan 6    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 7    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.8(70 ILCS 200/15-40); Civic Center Code; Benton Civic Center 9    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.10(70 ILCS 200/20-15); Civic Center Code; Bloomington Civic 11    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 12    parking.13(70 ILCS 200/35-35); Civic Center Code; Brownstown Park 14    District Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, 15    buildings, and parking.16(70 ILCS 200/40-35); Civic Center Code; Carbondale Civic 17    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 18    parking.19(70 ILCS 200/55-60); Civic Center Code; Chicago South Civic 20    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 21    parking.22(70 ILCS 200/60-30); Civic Center Code; Collinsville 23    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 24    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.25(70 ILCS 200/70-35); Civic Center Code; Crystal Lake Civic 26    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and   HB2681- 57 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    parking.2(70 ILCS 200/75-20); Civic Center Code; Decatur Metropolitan 3    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 4    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.5(70 ILCS 200/80-15); Civic Center Code; DuPage County 6    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 7    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.8(70 ILCS 200/85-35); Civic Center Code; Elgin Metropolitan 9    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 10    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.11(70 ILCS 200/95-25); Civic Center Code; Herrin Metropolitan 12    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 13    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.14(70 ILCS 200/110-35); Civic Center Code; Illinois Valley Civic 15    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 16    parking.17(70 ILCS 200/115-35); Civic Center Code; Jasper County Civic 18    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 19    parking.20(70 ILCS 200/120-25); Civic Center Code; Jefferson County 21    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 22    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.23(70 ILCS 200/125-15); Civic Center Code; Jo Daviess County 24    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 25    and parking.26(70 ILCS 200/130-30); Civic Center Code; Katherine Dunham   HB2681- 58 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 2    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.3(70 ILCS 200/145-35); Civic Center Code; Marengo Civic Center 4    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.5(70 ILCS 200/150-35); Civic Center Code; Mason County Civic 6    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 7    parking.8(70 ILCS 200/155-15); Civic Center Code; Matteson Metropolitan 9    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 10    and parking.11(70 ILCS 200/160-35); Civic Center Code; Maywood Civic Center 12    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.13(70 ILCS 200/165-35); Civic Center Code; Melrose Park 14    Metropolitan Exposition Auditorium and Office Building 15    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.16(70 ILCS 200/170-20); Civic Center Code; certain Metropolitan 17    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authorities; 18    for general purposes.19(70 ILCS 200/180-35); Civic Center Code; Normal Civic Center 20    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.21(70 ILCS 200/185-15); Civic Center Code; Oak Park Civic Center 22    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.23(70 ILCS 200/195-35); Civic Center Code; Ottawa Civic Center 24    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.25(70 ILCS 200/200-15); Civic Center Code; Pekin Civic Center 26    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.  HB2681- 59 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1(70 ILCS 200/205-15); Civic Center Code; Peoria Civic Center 2    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.3(70 ILCS 200/210-35); Civic Center Code; Pontiac Civic Center 4    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.5(70 ILCS 200/215-15); Civic Center Code; Illinois Quad City 6    Civic Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, 7    and parking.8(70 ILCS 200/220-30); Civic Center Code; Quincy Metropolitan 9    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for 10    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.11(70 ILCS 200/225-35); Civic Center Code; Randolph County Civic 12    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 13    parking.14(70 ILCS 200/230-35); Civic Center Code; River Forest 15    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 16    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.17(70 ILCS 200/235-40); Civic Center Code; Riverside Civic 18    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 19    parking.20(70 ILCS 200/245-35); Civic Center Code; Salem Civic Center 21    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.22(70 ILCS 200/255-20); Civic Center Code; Springfield 23    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 24    grounds, centers, and parking.25(70 ILCS 200/260-35); Civic Center Code; Sterling Metropolitan 26    Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building Authority; for   HB2681- 60 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.2(70 ILCS 200/265-20); Civic Center Code; Vermilion County 3    Metropolitan Exposition, Auditorium and Office Building 4    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.5(70 ILCS 200/270-35); Civic Center Code; Waukegan Civic Center 6    Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and parking.7(70 ILCS 200/275-35); Civic Center Code; West Frankfort Civic 8    Center Authority; for grounds, centers, buildings, and 9    parking.10(70 ILCS 200/280-20); Civic Center Code; Will County 11    Metropolitan Exposition and Auditorium Authority; for 12    grounds, centers, and parking.13(70 ILCS 210/5); Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority 14    Act; Metropolitan Pier and Exposition Authority; for 15    general purposes, including quick-take power.16(70 ILCS 405/22.04); Soil and Water Conservation Districts 17    Act; soil and water conservation districts; for general 18    purposes.19(70 ILCS 410/10 and 410/12); Conservation District Act; 20    conservation districts; for open space, wildland, scenic 21    roadway, pathway, outdoor recreation, or other 22    conservation benefits.23(70 ILCS 503/25); Chanute-Rantoul National Aviation Center 24    Redevelopment Commission Act; Chanute-Rantoul National 25    Aviation Center Redevelopment Commission; for general 26    purposes.  HB2681- 61 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1(70 ILCS 507/15); Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission Act; 2    Fort Sheridan Redevelopment Commission; for general 3    purposes or to carry out comprehensive or redevelopment 4    plans.5(70 ILCS 520/8); Southwestern Illinois Development Authority 6    Act; Southwestern Illinois Development Authority; for 7    general purposes, including quick-take power.8(70 ILCS 605/4-17 and 605/5-7); Illinois Drainage Code; 9    drainage districts; for general purposes.10(70 ILCS 615/5 and 615/6); Chicago Drainage District Act; 11    corporate authorities; for construction and maintenance of 12    works.13(70 ILCS 705/10); Fire Protection District Act; fire 14    protection districts; for general purposes.15(70 ILCS 750/20); Flood Prevention District Act; flood 16    prevention districts; for general purposes.17(70 ILCS 805/6); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 18    certain forest preserve districts; for general purposes.19(70 ILCS 805/18.8); Downstate Forest Preserve District Act; 20    certain forest preserve districts; for recreational and 21    cultural facilities.22(70 ILCS 810/8); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act; 23    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for general 24    purposes.25(70 ILCS 810/38); Cook County Forest Preserve District Act; 26    Forest Preserve District of Cook County; for recreational   HB2681- 62 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    facilities.2(70 ILCS 910/15 and 910/16); Hospital District Law; hospital 3    districts; for hospitals or hospital facilities.4(70 ILCS 915/3); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 5    Medical District Commission; for general purposes.6(70 ILCS 915/4.5); Illinois Medical District Act; Illinois 7    Medical District Commission; quick-take power for the 8    Illinois State Police Forensic Science Laboratory 9    (obsolete).10(70 ILCS 920/5); Tuberculosis Sanitarium District Act; 11    tuberculosis sanitarium districts; for tuberculosis 12    sanitariums.13(70 ILCS 925/20); Mid-Illinois Medical District Act; 14    Mid-Illinois Medical District; for general purposes.15(70 ILCS 930/20); Mid-America Medical District Act; 16    Mid-America Medical District Commission; for general 17    purposes.18(70 ILCS 935/20); Roseland Community Medical District Act; 19    medical district; for general purposes.20(70 ILCS 1005/7); Mosquito Abatement District Act; mosquito 21    abatement districts; for general purposes.22(70 ILCS 1105/8); Museum District Act; museum districts; for 23    general purposes.24(70 ILCS 1205/7-1); Park District Code; park districts; for 25    streets and other purposes.26(70 ILCS 1205/8-1); Park District Code; park districts; for   HB2681- 63 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    parks.2(70 ILCS 1205/9-2 and 1205/9-4); Park District Code; park 3    districts; for airports and landing fields.4(70 ILCS 1205/11-2 and 1205/11-3); Park District Code; park 5    districts; for State land abutting public water and 6    certain access rights.7(70 ILCS 1205/11.1-3); Park District Code; park districts; for 8    harbors.9(70 ILCS 1225/2); Park Commissioners Land Condemnation Act; 10    park districts; for street widening.11(70 ILCS 1230/1 and 1230/1-a); Park Commissioners Water 12    Control Act; park districts; for parks, boulevards, 13    driveways, parkways, viaducts, bridges, or tunnels.14(70 ILCS 1250/2); Park Commissioners Street Control (1889) 15    Act; park districts; for boulevards or driveways.16(70 ILCS 1290/1); Park District and Municipal Aquarium and 17    Museum Act; municipalities or park districts; for 18    aquariums or museums.19(70 ILCS 1305/2); Park District Airport Zoning Act; park 20    districts; for restriction of the height of structures.21(70 ILCS 1310/5); Park District Elevated Highway Act; park 22    districts; for elevated highways.23(70 ILCS 1505/15); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 24    District; for parks and other purposes.25(70 ILCS 1505/25.1); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 26    District; for parking lots or garages.  HB2681- 64 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1(70 ILCS 1505/26.3); Chicago Park District Act; Chicago Park 2    District; for harbors.3(70 ILCS 1570/5); Lincoln Park Commissioners Land Condemnation 4    Act; Lincoln Park Commissioners; for land and interests in 5    land, including riparian rights.6(70 ILCS 1801/30); Alexander-Cairo Port District Act; 7    Alexander-Cairo Port District; for general purposes.8(70 ILCS 1805/8); Havana Regional Port District Act; Havana 9    Regional Port District; for general purposes.10(70 ILCS 1810/7); Illinois International Port District Act; 11    Illinois International Port District; for general 12    purposes.13(70 ILCS 1815/13); Illinois Valley Regional Port District Act; 14    Illinois Valley Regional Port District; for general 15    purposes.16(70 ILCS 1820/4); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 17    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 18    District; for removal of airport hazards or reduction of 19    the height of objects or structures.20(70 ILCS 1820/5); Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 21    District Act; Jackson-Union Counties Regional Port 22    District; for general purposes.23(70 ILCS 1825/4.9); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 24    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.25(70 ILCS 1825/4.10); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 26    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of   HB2681- 65 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    objects or structures.2(70 ILCS 1825/4.18); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 3    Regional Port District; for removal of hazards from ports 4    and terminals.5(70 ILCS 1825/5); Joliet Regional Port District Act; Joliet 6    Regional Port District; for general purposes.7(70 ILCS 1830/7.1); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act; 8    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for removal of hazards 9    from ports and terminals.10(70 ILCS 1830/14); Kaskaskia Regional Port District Act; 11    Kaskaskia Regional Port District; for general purposes.12(70 ILCS 1831/30); Massac-Metropolis Port District Act; 13    Massac-Metropolis Port District; for general purposes.14(70 ILCS 1835/5.10); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; 15    Mt. Carmel Regional Port District; for removal of airport 16    hazards.17(70 ILCS 1835/5.11); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; 18    Mt. Carmel Regional Port District; for reduction of the 19    height of objects or structures.20(70 ILCS 1835/6); Mt. Carmel Regional Port District Act; Mt. 21    Carmel Regional Port District; for general purposes.22(70 ILCS 1837/30); Ottawa Port District Act; Ottawa Port 23    District; for general purposes.24(70 ILCS 1845/4.9); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 25    Regional Port District; for removal of airport hazards.26(70 ILCS 1845/4.10); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca   HB2681- 66 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    Regional Port District; for reduction of the height of 2    objects or structures.3(70 ILCS 1845/5); Seneca Regional Port District Act; Seneca 4    Regional Port District; for general purposes.5(70 ILCS 1850/4); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 6    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for removal of airport 7    hazards or reduction of the height of objects or 8    structures.9(70 ILCS 1850/5); Shawneetown Regional Port District Act; 10    Shawneetown Regional Port District; for general purposes.11(70 ILCS 1855/4); Southwest Regional Port District Act; 12    Southwest Regional Port District; for removal of airport 13    hazards or reduction of the height of objects or 14    structures.15(70 ILCS 1855/5); Southwest Regional Port District Act; 16    Southwest Regional Port District; for general purposes.17(70 ILCS 1860/4); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 18    Tri-City Regional Port District; for removal of airport 19    hazards.20(70 ILCS 1860/5); Tri-City Regional Port District Act; 21    Tri-City Regional Port District; for the development of 22    facilities.23(70 ILCS 1863/11); Upper Mississippi River International Port 24    District Act; Upper Mississippi River International Port 25    District; for general purposes.26(70 ILCS 1865/4.9); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port   HB2681- 67 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    District; for removal of airport hazards.2(70 ILCS 1865/4.10); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 3    District; for restricting the height of objects or 4    structures.5(70 ILCS 1865/5); Waukegan Port District Act; Waukegan Port 6    District; for the development of facilities.7(70 ILCS 1870/8); White County Port District Act; White County 8    Port District; for the development of facilities.9(70 ILCS 1905/16); Railroad Terminal Authority Act; Railroad 10    Terminal Authority (Chicago); for general purposes.11(70 ILCS 1915/25); Grand Avenue Railroad Relocation Authority 12    Act; Grand Avenue Railroad Relocation Authority; for 13    general purposes, including quick-take power (now 14    obsolete).15(70 ILCS 1935/25); Elmwood Park Grade Separation Authority 16    Act; Elmwood Park Grade Separation Authority; for general 17    purposes.18(70 ILCS 2105/9b); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 19    conservancy districts; for general purposes.20(70 ILCS 2105/10a); River Conservancy Districts Act; river 21    conservancy districts; for corporate purposes.22(70 ILCS 2205/15); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 23    districts; for corporate purposes.24(70 ILCS 2205/18); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary 25    districts; for improvements and works.26(70 ILCS 2205/19); Sanitary District Act of 1907; sanitary   HB2681- 68 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    districts; for access to property.2(70 ILCS 2305/8); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 3    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for corporate 4    purposes.5(70 ILCS 2305/15); North Shore Water Reclamation District Act; 6    North Shore Water Reclamation District; for improvements.7(70 ILCS 2405/7.9); Sanitary District Act of 1917; Sanitary 8    District of Decatur; for carrying out agreements to sell, 9    convey, or disburse treated wastewater to a private 10    entity.11(70 ILCS 2405/8); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 12    districts; for corporate purposes.13(70 ILCS 2405/15); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 14    districts; for improvements.15(70 ILCS 2405/16.9 and 2405/16.10); Sanitary District Act of 16    1917; sanitary districts; for waterworks.17(70 ILCS 2405/17.2); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 18    districts; for public sewer and water utility treatment 19    works.20(70 ILCS 2405/18); Sanitary District Act of 1917; sanitary 21    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 22    flow.23(70 ILCS 2605/8); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; 24    Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for corporate 25    purposes.26(70 ILCS 2605/16); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District   HB2681- 69 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; quick-take 2    power for improvements.3(70 ILCS 2605/17); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 4    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for bridges.5(70 ILCS 2605/35); Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 6    Act; Metropolitan Water Reclamation District; for widening 7    and deepening a navigable stream.8(70 ILCS 2805/10); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 9    districts; for corporate purposes.10(70 ILCS 2805/24); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 11    districts; for improvements.12(70 ILCS 2805/26i and 2805/26j); Sanitary District Act of 13    1936; sanitary districts; for drainage systems.14(70 ILCS 2805/27); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 15    districts; for dams or other structures to regulate water 16    flow.17(70 ILCS 2805/32k); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 18    districts; for water supply.19(70 ILCS 2805/32l); Sanitary District Act of 1936; sanitary 20    districts; for waterworks.21(70 ILCS 2905/2-7); Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; 22    Metro-East Sanitary District; for corporate purposes.23(70 ILCS 2905/2-8); Metro-East Sanitary District Act of 1974; 24    Metro-East Sanitary District; for access to property.25(70 ILCS 3010/10); Sanitary District Revenue Bond Act; 26    sanitary districts; for sewerage systems.  HB2681- 70 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1(70 ILCS 3205/12); Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act; 2    Illinois Sports Facilities Authority; quick-take power for 3    its corporate purposes (obsolete).4(70 ILCS 3405/16); Surface Water Protection District Act; 5    surface water protection districts; for corporate 6    purposes.7(70 ILCS 3605/7); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 8    Transit Authority; for transportation systems.9(70 ILCS 3605/8); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 10    Transit Authority; for general purposes.11(70 ILCS 3605/10); Metropolitan Transit Authority Act; Chicago 12    Transit Authority; for general purposes, including 13    railroad property.14(70 ILCS 3610/3 and 3610/5); Local Mass Transit District Act; 15    local mass transit districts; for general purposes.16(70 ILCS 3615/2.13); Regional Transportation Authority Act; 17    Regional Transportation Authority; for general purposes.18(70 ILCS 3705/8 and 3705/12); Public Water District Act; 19    public water districts; for waterworks.20(70 ILCS 3705/23a); Public Water District Act; public water 21    districts; for sewerage properties.22(70 ILCS 3705/23e); Public Water District Act; public water 23    districts; for combined waterworks and sewerage systems.24(70 ILCS 3715/6); Water Authorities Act; water authorities; 25    for facilities to ensure adequate water supply.26(70 ILCS 3715/27); Water Authorities Act; water authorities;   HB2681- 71 -LRB104 06230 RTM 16265 b1    for access to property.2(75 ILCS 5/4-7); Illinois Local Library Act; boards of library 3    trustees; for library buildings.4(75 ILCS 16/30-55.80); Public Library District Act of 1991; 5    public library districts; for general purposes.6(75 ILCS 65/1 and 65/3); Libraries in Parks Act; corporate 7    authorities of city or park district, or board of park 8    commissioners; for free public library buildings.9(Source: Incorporates 98-564, eff. 8-27-13; P.A. 98-756, eff. 107-16-14; 99-669, eff. 7-29-16.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.